Massachusetts, session 194th, S495.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 19A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 4 the
following section:-
Section 4 ½. (a) There is hereby established within the executive office of health and
human services a Hospital to Home Partnership Program, with the mission to promote
partnerships between Acute Care Hospitals, as defined by section 25B of chapter 111 and Aging
Services Access Points (ASAPs), as defined by section 4B of chapter 19A and to strengthen
communication and coordination with community providers to promote institutional diversion
and increase discharge rates from hospitals to home and community-based settings.
(b) There will be within each participating Acute Care Hospital no less than 1 ASAP staff
serving as Home and Community Based Services (HCBS) Hospital Liaisons, with the designated
role to support the Hospital’s efforts to connect individuals to HCBS programs and community
of 2

services to enable a community discharge instead of a skilled nursing facility or other
institutional placement
of 2